New York, session 2025-2026, A5660.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "carbon 2 farming act". 3 § 2. Section 150 of the agriculture and markets law is amended by 4 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 5 5. "Carbon farming" means the implementation of land management strat- 6 egies for the purposes of sequestering greenhouse gas emissions into 7 agricultural soils, minerals and biomass on land used in support of a 8 farm operation, or in carbonate minerals or bicarbonates, through 9 approved carbon farming practices pursuant to section one hundred 10 fifty-one-s of this chapter. 11 § 3. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new arti- 12 cle 11-C to read as follows: 13 ARTICLE 11-C 14 CARBON FARMING ACT 15 Section 151-p. Legislative findings and intent. 16 151-q. Definitions. 17 151-r. Carbon farming certification committee. 18 151-s. Approval of carbon farming certification. 19 151-t. Carbon farming education. 20 § 151-p. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds and 21 declares that carbon farming presents a significant economic opportunity 22 for New York's agricultural sector while advancing the state's climate 23 goals. By incentivizing soil carbon sequestration, enhancing soil EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00292-06-5 A. 5660--A 2 1 health, and reducing greenhouse gas emissions, this legislation will 2 provide direct economic benefits to farmers, improve long-term agricul- 3 tural productivity, and contribute to the expansion of a carbon farming 4 industry within the state. Establishing New York as a leader in this 5 field will promote investment, job creation, and rural economic develop- 6 ment, while also positioning the state as a model for integrating 7 climate-smart agricultural practices into a broader decarbonization 8 strategy. 9 § 151-q. Definitions. As used in this article: 10 1. "Committee" means the carbon farming certification committee estab- 11 lished pursuant to section one hundred fifty-one-r of this article. 12 2. "Carbon farming certification framework" or "certification frame- 13 work" means the set of technical criteria and procedures used to deter- 14 mine eligibility for the carbon farming tax credit. The certification 15 framework shall be used to: (a) identify qualified carbon farming prac- 16 tices that are appropriate and effective within the context of New York 17 state farming systems, based on credible research and regionally rele- 18 vant data; (b) define the factors to be considered in evaluating carbon 19 sequestration potential, including expected duration of storage, moni- 20 toring and verification requirements, appropriate application ranges, 21 and implementation conditions; and (c) provide the basis for developing 22 practice-specific certification standards for each qualified practice. 23 3. "Carbon farming practice standard" or "practice standard" means the 24 set of practice-specific requirements that shall be met for a qualified 25 practice to be eligible for the carbon farming tax credit. Each practice 26 standard shall: (a) establish the parameters for monitoring, reporting 27 and verification, consistent with accepted scientific and technical 28 methodologies; (b) define appropriate application ranges and implementa- 29 tion thresholds to ensure agronomic suitability and to prevent excessive 30 use of a practice solely for the purpose of increasing the credit value; 31 and (c) specify the conditions under which the practice shall be imple- 32 mented to ensure that the intended carbon sequestration outcomes are 33 achieved. 34 4. "Carbon farming credit value" or "credit value" means the monetary 35 value assigned per metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent removed 36 through qualified practices, based on the social cost of carbon as 37 adopted by the department pursuant to section 75-0113 of the environ- 38 mental conservation law, and adjusted, where applicable, by a factor 39 reflecting the expected duration of carbon sequestration. 40 5. "Carbon farming tax credit" means the carbon farming credit estab- 41 lished pursuant to section two hundred ten-B or six hundred six of the 42 tax law. 43 6. "Durability rating" means an assessment of the expected length of 44 time that carbon dioxide removed through a qualified practice will 45 remain sequestered. Practices that are determined to store carbon for 46 one hundred years or longer shall receive the highest rating. Practices 47 with shorter storage durations shall receive proportionally lower 48 ratings, to ensure that the value of the tax credit reflects the longev- 49 ity of the carbon benefits, as determined using methodologies approved 50 by the department. 51 7. "Farm product" has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision 52 five of section two of this chapter. 53 8. "Monitoring, reporting, and verification" or "MRV" means the 54 systematic process of tracking, documenting, and confirming the carbon 55 sequestration impact of carbon farming practices through approved meth- 56 odologies, ensuring compliance and transparency in reported outcomes. A. 5660--A 3 1 § 151-r. Carbon farming certification committee. 1. There is hereby 2 created within the department a carbon farming certification committee 3 for the purpose of developing a certification framework, determining 4 qualified carbon removal practices eligible for the carbon farming tax 5 credit, and promulgating certification standards for qualified carbon 6 removal practices. 7 2. The carbon farming certification committee shall consist of: the 8 commissioner or their chosen designee; the commissioner of environmental 9 conservation or their chosen designee; two representatives appointed by 10 the governor; two representatives appointed by the temporary president 11 of the senate; two representatives appointed by the speaker of the 12 assembly; one representative appointed by the minority leader of the 13 senate; and one representative appointed by the minority leader of the 14 assembly. Such members shall be appointed in accordance with the 15 provisions of subdivision three of this section. 16 3. The carbon farming certification committee shall include members 17 from regions throughout the state and shall include at least one repre- 18 sentative practicing farming in the state. Such representatives shall 19 have experience in one or more of the following fields: soil science, 20 agronomy, carbon quantification, climate science, or New York state 21 farming systems. 22 4. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation but 23 shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses incurred 24 in the performance of their duties. 25 5. The committee shall establish a framework for evaluating carbon 26 farming practices that will be used to qualify carbon farming practices 27 for the carbon farming tax credit and develop practice specific certif- 28 ication standards for each qualified practice. Pursuant to qualifying or 29 disqualifying a practice, the committee shall assess, consider, and make 30 determinations in reference to the following: 31 (a) scientific evidence of carbon sequestration benefits of carbon 32 farming practices under New York state conditions; 33 (b) parameters required for monitoring, reporting and verification of 34 each practice, consistent with accepted scientific and technical method- 35 ologies; 36 (c) appropriate application ranges and implementation thresholds for 37 each qualified practice to ensure agronomic suitability and prevent 38 excessive application; and 39 (d) other conditions under which each practice must be implemented to 40 ensure the intended carbon sequestration outcomes are achieved. 41 6. Before finalizing the certification framework, determining quali- 42 fied carbon removal practices eligible for the carbon farming tax credit 43 and promulgating certification standards for the qualified carbon 44 removal practices pursuant to subdivision one of this section, the 45 committee shall provide a draft framework to the department and the 46 department shall make such information available on its website. 47 7. The committee shall hold at least three public hearings on the 48 draft framework and shall allow at least sixty days for the submission 49 of public comment. 50 8. The committee shall convene within sixty days of the effective date 51 of this section and shall deliver the certification framework, determine 52 qualified practices, and deliver associated practice-specific certif- 53 ication standards to the department no later than eighteen months from 54 the date of its first meeting. 55 9. The committee shall meet no less than annually to review the 56 certification framework and certification standards and may modify such A. 5660--A 4 1 framework and standards to incorporate new data and scientific findings. 2 The committee shall review qualified carbon removal practices and modify 3 such practices as needed. 4 § 151-s. Approval of carbon farming certification. 1. Upon delivery of 5 the certification framework, qualified carbon removal practices eligible 6 for the carbon farming tax credit, and certification standards from the 7 carbon farming certification committee pursuant to section one hundred 8 fifty-one-r of this article, the department shall review, amend and 9 approve such certification framework and certification standards no 10 later than six months after delivery to the department by the committee. 11 The department, in consultation with the department of environmental 12 conservation, shall: 13 (a) establish procedures for verifying compliance with each practice- 14 specific certification standard; and 15 (b) promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the 16 provisions of this subdivision. 17 2. Upon approval of the certification framework, list of qualified 18 practices, and associated practice-specific certification standards, the 19 department shall transmit such materials to the department of taxation 20 and finance for the purpose of administering the carbon farming tax 21 credit authorized pursuant to the tax law. 22 3. The department shall provide ongoing technical guidance and support 23 to the department of taxation and finance as needed to ensure that tax 24 credit claims are consistent with the approved certification framework 25 and certification standards. 26 4. The department of taxation and finance shall consult with the 27 department as needed to verify compliance, resolve disputes, and support 28 implementation of the credit. 29 § 151-t. Carbon farming education. 1. The department, in cooperation 30 with the department of environmental conservation, the state soil and 31 water conservation committee, and the New York state college of agricul- 32 ture and life sciences shall develop educational materials to encourage 33 carbon farming. Such educational materials shall promote farming prac- 34 tices which reduce, sequester and mitigate greenhouse gas emissions on 35 land used in support of a farm operation. 36 2. The department shall promote the carbon farming tax credit estab- 37 lished pursuant to sections two hundred ten-B and six hundred six of the 38 tax law. 39 § 4. Section 210-B of the tax law is amended by adding a new subdivi- 40 sion 63 to read as follows: 41 63. Carbon farming credit. (a) Allowance of credit. A taxpayer that is 42 an agricultural business that produces farm products shall be allowed a 43 credit against the tax imposed by this article for the practice of 44 carbon farming. 45 (b) Definitions. For purposes of this section the following terms 46 shall have the following meanings: 47 (i) "carbon farming" shall have the same meaning as set forth in 48 subdivision five of section one hundred fifty of the agriculture and 49 markets law; 50 (ii) "carbon farming credit value" shall mean the monetary value 51 assigned per metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent removed through 52 qualified carbon farming practices, based on the social cost of carbon 53 as set forth in section 75-0113 of the environmental conservation law, 54 and adjusted, where applicable, by a factor reflecting the expected 55 duration of carbon sequestration; A. 5660--A 5 1 (iii) "carbon sequestration" shall mean the storage of carbon in 2 trees, soil, minerals, and water; 3 (iv) "durability rating" shall mean an assessment of the expected 4 length of time that carbon dioxide removed through a qualified practice 5 will remain sequestered. Practices that are determined to result in 6 carbon sequestration of one hundred years or more shall be assigned a 7 durability rating equal to one; 8 (v) "farm products" shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdi- 9 vision five of section two of the agriculture and markets law; 10 (vi) "qualified carbon farming practice" shall mean a practice listed 11 as eligible under the carbon farming certification framework established 12 pursuant to section one hundred fifty-one-r of the agriculture and 13 markets law; and 14 (vii) "social cost of carbon" shall have the same meaning as set forth 15 in section 75-0113 of the environmental conservation law. 16 (c) Valuation of credit. The monetary value of the credit, per metric 17 ton, shall vary according to the durability rating of each carbon farm- 18 ing practice. Values shall be derived from the social cost of carbon and 19 adjusted based on the durability rating of each practice to ensure that 20 the value of the tax credit reflects the longevity of the carbon bene- 21 fits. Practices that are determined to store carbon for one hundred 22 years or longer shall be assigned credit values equal to the social cost 23 of carbon per metric ton. Practices with shorter storage durations shall 24 be assigned proportionally lower credit values adjusted for their dura- 25 bility rating. 26 (d) Application of credit. Such credit shall be equal to the total 27 number of metric tons of carbon dioxide removed and sequestered during 28 the taxable year, as certified pursuant to section one hundred fifty- 29 one-s of the agriculture and markets law, multiplied by the carbon farm- 30 ing credit value. 31 (e) Certification required. The taxpayer shall attach to its tax 32 return its final certificate of eligibility issued by the commissioner 33 of agriculture and markets pursuant to section one hundred fifty-one-s 34 of the agriculture and markets law. In no event shall the taxpayer be 35 allowed a credit greater than the amount of the credit listed on the 36 final certificate verifying the emissions reductions to be credited to 37 the taxpayer. 38 (f) Carryover of credit. If the amount of the credit allowable under 39 this subdivision shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year and the 40 taxpayer's New York adjusted gross income for such year does not exceed 41 sixty thousand dollars, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of 42 tax to be credited or refunded in accordance with the provisions of 43 section six hundred eighty-six of this chapter, provided, however, that 44 no interest shall be paid thereon. If the taxpayer's New York adjusted 45 gross income for such year exceeds sixty thousand dollars, the excess 46 credit may be carried over to the following year or years and may be 47 deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. 48 § 5. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 49 (uuu) to read as follows: 50 (uuu) Carbon farming credit. (1) Allowance of credit. A taxpayer who 51 provides farm products and who practices carbon farming shall be allowed 52 a credit against the tax imposed by this article. 53 (2) Definitions. For the purposes of this subsection, the following 54 definitions shall apply: A. 5660--A 6 1 (A) "Carbon farming" shall have the same meaning as set forth in 2 subdivision five of section one hundred fifty of the agriculture and 3 markets law. 4 (B) "Carbon farming credit value" shall mean the monetary value 5 assigned per metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent removed through 6 qualified carbon farming practices, based on the social cost of carbon 7 as set forth in section 75-0113 of the environmental conservation law, 8 and adjusted, where applicable, by a factor reflecting the expected 9 duration of carbon sequestration. 10 (C) "Carbon sequestration" shall mean the storage of carbon in trees, 11 soil, minerals, and water. 12 (D) "Durability rating" shall mean an assessment of the expected 13 length of time that carbon dioxide removed through a qualified practice 14 will remain sequestered. Practices that are determined to result in 15 carbon sequestration of one hundred years or more shall be assigned a 16 durability rating equal to one. 17 (E) "Farm products" shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdi- 18 vision five of section two of the agriculture and markets law. 19 (F) "Qualified carbon farming practice" shall mean a practice listed 20 as eligible under the carbon farming certification framework established 21 pursuant to section one hundred fifty-one-r of the agriculture and 22 markets law. 23 (G) "Social cost of carbon" shall have the same meaning as set forth 24 in section 75-0113 of the environmental conservation law. 25 (3) Application of credit. Such credit shall be equal to the total 26 number of metric tons of carbon dioxide removed and sequestered during 27 the taxable year, as certified pursuant to section one hundred fifty- 28 one-s of the agriculture and markets law, multiplied by the carbon farm- 29 ing credit value. 30 (4) Certification required. The taxpayer shall attach to its tax 31 return its final certificate of eligibility issued by the commissioner 32 of agriculture and markets pursuant to section one hundred fifty-one-s 33 of the agriculture and markets law. In no event shall the taxpayer be 34 allowed a credit greater than the amount of the credit listed on the 35 final certificate verifying the emissions reductions to be credited to 36 the taxpayer. 37 (5) Carryover of credit. If the amount of the credit allowable under 38 this subsection shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year and the 39 taxpayer's New York adjusted gross income for such year does not exceed 40 sixty thousand dollars, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of 41 tax to be credited or refunded in accordance with the provisions of 42 section six hundred eighty-six of this article, provided, however, 43 that no interest shall be paid thereon. If the taxpayer's New York 44 adjusted gross income for such year exceeds sixty thousand dollars, 45 the excess credit may be carried over to the following year or years 46 and may be deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. 47 § 6. Paragraph (a-1) of subdivision 1 of section 210-B of the tax law, 48 as added by section one of subpart A of part B of chapter 59 of the laws 49 of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 50 (a-1) For a taxpayer that is an eligible farmer, as defined in subdi- 51 vision eleven of this section, the percentage to be used to compute the 52 credit allowed under this subdivision shall be twenty percent for prop- 53 erty described in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of this subdivision 54 that is principally used by the taxpayer in the production of goods by 55 farming, agriculture, horticulture, floriculture or viticulture. For any 56 such property described in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of this A. 5660--A 7 1 subdivision that is principally used by the eligible taxpayer for the 2 purposes of carbon farming, as defined in subdivision five of section 3 one hundred fifty of the agriculture and markets law, the percentage to 4 be used to compute the credit allowed under this subdivision shall be an 5 additional ten percent. 6 § 7. Paragraph 1-a of subsection (a) of section 606 of the tax law, as 7 added by section 2 of subpart A of part B of chapter 59 of the laws of 8 2022, is amended to read as follows: 9 (1-a) For a taxpayer that is an eligible farmer, as defined in 10 subsection (n) of this section, the percentage to be used to compute the 11 credit allowed under this subsection shall be twenty percent for proper- 12 ty described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph two of this subsection 13 that is principally used by the taxpayer in the production of goods by 14 farming, agriculture, horticulture, floriculture or viticulture. For any 15 such property described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph two of this 16 subsection that is principally used by the eligible taxpayer for the 17 purposes of carbon farming, as defined in subdivision five of section 18 one hundred fifty of the agriculture and markets law, the percentage to 19 be used to compute the credit allowed under this subsection shall be an 20 additional ten percent. 21 § 8. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 22 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 23 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 24 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 25 completed on or before such effective date.